Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 INFORMED CONSENT 2 Section 1. Section 146A.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Prior to performing an abortion, 5 a physician shall perform an in-person examination of the 6 pregnant woman including screening for indicia of coercion or 7 abuse. A physician shall, if necessary, refer the woman to an 8 appropriate health care provider for treatment consistent with 9 the examination results. 10 Sec. 2. Section 146A.1, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraphs: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âAbortionâ means the same as defined in 13 section 146B.1. 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00a. âHealth care providerâ means a 15 person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or 16 permitted by the laws of this state to administer health care 17 in the ordinary course of business or in the practice of a 18 profession. 19 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. âPhysicianâ means the same as defined 20 in section 146B.1. 21 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 146A.2 Dispensing abortion-inducing 22 drugs ââ licensee discipline. 23 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 24 requires: 25 a. âAbortion-inducing drugâ means the same as defined in 26 section 146F.1. 27 b. âChemical abortionâ means the same as defined in section 28 146F.1. 29 c. âDispenseâ means the same as defined in section 146F.1. 30 d. âMedical emergencyâ means the same as defined in section 31 146A.1. 32 e. âPregnantâ or âpregnancyâ means the human female 33 reproductive condition of having a living unborn child within 34 the pregnant womanâs body throughout every stage of the unborn 35 -1- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 1/ 12 S.F. _____ childâs life and development, from fertilization to full 1 gestation and childbirth. 2 2. A physician shall do all of the following prior to 3 prescribing or dispensing an abortion-inducing drug to a 4 pregnant woman: 5 a. Obtain the signature of the woman on the United States 6 food and drug administration patient agreement form required 7 for each abortion-inducing drug authorized to be manufactured 8 or sold in the United States. 9 b. Obtain written confirmation from the woman that the woman 10 has been informed of all of the following information: 11 (1) The gestational age-specific risks of abortion-inducing 12 drugs. 13 (2) The risks related to the specific abortion-inducing 14 drug or drugs to be used, including hemorrhage, failure to 15 remove all tissue of the unborn child, sepsis, sterility, and 16 possible continuation of the pregnancy. 17 (3) That the United States federal food and drug 18 administration recommends that the pregnant woman follow up 19 with the womanâs health care provider approximately seven 20 to fourteen calendar days after the administration of an 21 abortion-inducing drug to confirm complete termination of 22 pregnancy has occurred and to evaluate the degree of bleeding. 23 (4) That women using abortion-inducing drugs have suffered 24 trauma from seeing the remains of the unborn child in the 25 process of a chemical abortion. 26 (5) That it may be possible to reverse the intended effects 27 of a chemical abortion, but time is of the essence. 28 (6) That information on reversing the effects of a chemical 29 abortion is available on the departmentâs internet site. 30 c. Advise the pregnant woman how to access emergency 31 surgical intervention in case of an incomplete abortion, severe 32 bleeding, or other medical complications. 33 3. Subsection 2 shall not apply to a chemical abortion 34 performed in a medical emergency. 35 -2- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 2/ 12 S.F. _____ 4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil or 1 criminal liability on a woman upon whom a chemical abortion has 2 been performed. 3 5. A physician who fails to comply with this section is 4 subject to licensee discipline under chapter 148. 5 6. The board of medicine shall adopt rules pursuant to 6 chapter 17A to administer this section. 7 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 146A.3 Informational materials. 8 1. As used in this section, âchemical abortionâ means the 9 same as defined in section 146F.1. 10 2. The department shall publish on the departmentâs 11 internet site, in an easily accessible location and format, all 12 of the following: 13 a. Notice that it may be possible to reverse the effects of 14 a chemical abortion. 15 b. Information and resources on reversing the effects of a 16 chemical abortion. 17 DIVISION II 18 DISPENSING AND REPORTING ââ ABORTION-INDUCING DRUGS 19 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 146F.1 Definitions. 20 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 21 requires: 22 1. âAbortion-inducing drugâ means any of the following: 23 a. Mifepristone. 24 b. Misoprostol. 25 c. Any other drug, measure, or chemical approved by the 26 United States food and drug administration when prescribed or 27 administered with the intent to terminate the pregnancy of a 28 woman known to be pregnant. âAbortion-inducing drugâ includes 29 off-label use of a drug known to have abortion-inducing 30 properties, which is prescribed with the intent of causing an 31 abortion. âAbortion-inducing drugâ does not include drugs that 32 may be known to cause an abortion but that are prescribed for 33 other medical conditions. 34 2. âAbortion-inducing drug complicationâ means any physical 35 -3- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 3/ 12 S.F. _____ or psychological condition which, in the reasonable medical 1 judgment of a health care provider, may occur as a primary or 2 secondary result of the patientâs use of abortion-inducing 3 drugs including but not limited to: 4 a. Uterine perforation. 5 b. Cervical laceration. 6 c. Infection. 7 d. Bleeding. 8 e. Vaginal bleeding that qualifies under the common toxicity 9 criteria established by the national cancer institute as a 10 grade 2 or higher. 11 f. Pulmonary embolism. 12 g. Deep vein thrombosis. 13 h. Failure to actually terminate the pregnancy. 14 i. Incomplete abortion or retained tissue. 15 j. Pelvic inflammatory disease. 16 k. Endometritis. 17 l. Missed ectopic pregnancy. 18 m. Cardiac arrest. 19 n. Respiratory arrest. 20 o. Renal failure. 21 p. Shock. 22 q. Amniotic fluid embolism. 23 r. Coma. 24 s. Free fluid in the abdomen. 25 t. Allergic reactions to anesthesia and abortion-inducing 26 drugs. 27 u. Mood, anxiety, or trauma-related disorder symptoms as 28 described in the most recent diagnostic and statistical manual 29 of mental disorders published by the American psychiatric 30 association. 31 3. âChemical abortionâ means an abortion performed by the 32 administration or use of an abortion-inducing drug. 33 4. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 34 services. 35 -4- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 4/ 12 S.F. _____ 5. âDispenseâ means to distribute, administer, or send an 1 abortion-inducing drug to the ultimate user. 2 6. âHealth care providerâ means the same as defined in 3 section 146A.1. 4 7. âHealth care settingâ means a clinic, medical office, or 5 hospital. 6 8. âHospitalâ means the same as defined in section 135B.1. 7 9. âInterested partyâ means any of the following persons: 8 a. A woman upon whom a chemical abortion was performed or 9 attempted. 10 b. The biological father of the unborn child who was aborted 11 or was attempted to be aborted through a chemical abortion. 12 c. A grandparent, parent, sibling, child, legal guardian, 13 or conservator of the woman upon whom a chemical abortion was 14 performed or was attempted. 15 10. âMedical emergencyâ means the same as defined in section 16 146A.1. 17 11. âPhysicianâ means the same as defined in section 146B.1. 18 12. âPostfertilization ageâ means the same as defined in 19 section 146B.1. 20 13. âPregnancyâ or âpregnantâ means the same as defined in 21 section 146A.2. 22 14. âRural emergency hospitalâ means the same as defined in 23 section 135B.1. 24 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 146F.2 Dispensing of abortion-inducing 25 drugs ââ restrictions. 26 1. A person shall not dispense an abortion-inducing drug in 27 this state unless all of the following criteria are met: 28 a. The drug is dispensed in a health care setting directly 29 to the woman prescribed the drug. 30 b. The person dispensing the drug is authorized to do so 31 pursuant to section 147.107. 32 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to the dispensing of an 33 abortion-inducing drug in response to a medical emergency. 34 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 146F.3 Abortion-inducing drug 35 -5- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 5/ 12 S.F. _____ complication ââ reporting. 1 1. a. Within thirty calendar days of the date of discharge 2 or death of a woman who presented with or was treated for 3 an abortion-inducing drug complication, a hospital, rural 4 emergency hospital, or an attending physician shall file a 5 report with the department. The report shall be in a form 6 prescribed by the department and include a list of the most 7 common abortion complications and the most recent international 8 classification of diseases code as maintained by the world 9 health organization for each. The report must be completed and 10 signed by the womanâs attending physician and contain all of 11 the following information: 12 (1) The age of the woman who presented with or was treated 13 for an abortion-inducing drug complication. 14 (2) The state and county of residence of the woman who 15 presented with or was treated for an abortion-inducing drug 16 complication. 17 (3) The date the abortion-inducing drug was used by the 18 woman. 19 (4) The probable postfertilization age of the unborn child 20 on the date of the abortion-inducing drug complication. 21 (5) The identity of the physician who performed the 22 chemical abortion, the facility where the chemical abortion was 23 performed, and the referring physician, agency, or service, if 24 any. 25 (6) The specific complication or complications that led to 26 the treatment and the most recent international classification 27 of diseases code for each complication as maintained by the 28 world health organization, if applicable. 29 b. A report shall not contain the name of the woman or 30 other information or identifiers that would make it possible to 31 identify the woman who suffered the reported abortion-inducing 32 drug complication. 33 2. A report filed pursuant to subsection 1 shall be 34 confidential and not subject to disclosure under chapter 22. 35 -6- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 6/ 12 S.F. _____ 3. a. On or before December 31, 2026, and every calendar 1 year thereafter, the department shall prepare a comprehensive 2 statistical report based upon the aggregated data gathered from 3 reports filed pursuant to subsection 1 for the immediately 4 preceding calendar year. The aggregated data shall be 5 anonymized to prevent public disclosure of either of the 6 following: 7 (1) The hospital, rural emergency hospital, or attending 8 physician that filed a report. 9 (2) The woman about whom a report was filed. 10 b. The anonymized aggregated data shall be made available to 11 the public by the department in a downloadable format on the 12 departmentâs internet site. 13 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 146F.4 Private cause of action ââ 14 strict liability. 15 1. A person who dispenses an abortion-inducing drug 16 in violation of this chapter shall be strictly liable 17 to any interested party for all damages caused by the 18 abortion-inducing drug. 19 2. In addition to compensatory or punitive damages, a 20 prevailing plaintiff who brings an action under this section is 21 entitled to all of the following: 22 a. Statutory damages in the amount of fifty thousand 23 dollars. 24 b. Court costs. 25 c. Reasonable attorney fees. 26 3. In an action brought under this section, the name and 27 other identifying characteristics of a woman who sought or 28 obtained an abortion-inducing drug shall be redacted without 29 a court order from all pleadings and documents filed in the 30 action. The court may make further orders as necessary to 31 protect the identity and privacy of the woman who sought or 32 obtained an abortion-inducing drug. 33 4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil or 34 criminal liability on a woman upon whom a chemical abortion is 35 -7- LSB 6852XC (1) 91 ak/ko 7/ 12 S.F. _____ performed. 1 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 146F.5 Licensee discipline. 2 A licensee who fails to comply with this chapter is subject 3 to licensee discipline under chapter 148. 4 DIVISION III 5 ABORTION-RELATED PROVISIONS 6 Sec. 10. Section 144.29A, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 k. The method used for an induced termination, including 9 whether mifepristone or misoprostol was used. 10 Sec. 11. Section 144.29A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 11 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. If a spontaneous termination of 13 pregnancy, whether the patient ingested mifepristone or 14 misoprostol within fourteen calendar days prior to the date of 15 the spontaneous termination of pregnancy. 16 Sec. 12. Section 144.29A, subsection 7, paragraph c, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 c. âSpontaneous termination of pregnancyâ , commonly known 19 as a miscarriage, means the occurrence of an unintended 20 termination of pregnancy at any time during the period from 21 conception to twenty weeks gestation and which is not a 22 spontaneous termination of pregnancy at any time during the 23 period from twenty weeks or greater which is reported to the 24 department as a fetal death under this chapter . 25 Sec. 13. Section 146B.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 1. âAbortionâ means the termination of a human pregnancy 28 with the intent other than to produce a live birth or to 29 remove a dead fetus. âAbortionâ does not include a spontaneous 30 termination of pregnancy, commonly known as a miscarriage, if 31 not all the products of conception are expelled. 32